Massachusetts, session 194th, H1029.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary Section 7 of Chapter
21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end there of the following: -
Section 7: (a) For purposes of this section following actions shall be taken by the
Department of Environmental Protection:
The Department of Environmental Protection shall review the Guidelines on chemicals
found in drinking water tested in the Commonwealth for the purposes of classifying
Massachusetts maximum containment levels for certain harmful compounds. The Department of
Environmental protection shall, with respect to n-Nitrosodimethylamine, promulgate
of 2

Massachusetts maximum containment levels, that shall be considered the maximum safe amount
of n-Nitrosodimethylamine present in drinking water so that it does not negatively affect human
health.
The Department of Environmental Protection shall, upon receiving reports of levels of n-
Nitrosodimethylamine outside the Massachusetts maximum containment levels, provide a copy
of those reports to the Clerks of the House and the Senate. The Department of Environmental
Protection shall then treat any such level found above the Massachusetts maximum containment
level as if it were a violation of the Department of Environmental Protection Drinking Water
regulation 310 CMR 22.00. Pursuant to 310 CMR 22.01(2) the Department of Environmental
Protection shall exercise its authority as it sees fit to enforce the standard of the Massachusetts
maximum containment levels promulgated in this section with respect to n-
Nitrosodimethylamine.
The Department of Environmental Protection shall provide a report annually to the clerks
of the House and the Senate that details the total number of examinations done of drinking water
in the Commonwealth, as well as how many of those were found to contain n-
Nitrosodimethylamine levels above the Massachusetts maximum containment level.
of 2